Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the State Forestry Department, for the  biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for  the following
purposes:
(1) Agency administration..............  $ 758,644
(2) Fire protection..........................  $ 82,519,290
(3) Forest resources .......................  $ 59,908,716
(4) Debt service ..............................  $ 17,468,121
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and in-
cluding federal funds from the  United States Forest Service for fire protection and for re-
search projects, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described  in this section,
collected or received by the State Forestry Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Agency administration .............. $ 71,590,442
(2) Fire protection .......................... $116,323,906
(3) State forests ............................. $131,308,926
(4) Forest resources ....................... $ 36,345,324
(5) Capital improvement................. $ 10,651,626
(6) Debt service .............................. $ 3,147,987
(7) Equipment pool......................... $ 35,410,736
(8) Facilities maintenance
and management ....................... $ 6,411,934
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,558,120 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the  State Forestry Department for debt service relating to the
purchase of land in the Gilchrist State Forest.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
Enrolled Senate Bill 5521 (SB 5521-A) Page 1
of expenses from federal funds other than those described  in section 2 of this 2025 Act, col-
lected or received by the State Forestry Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Agency administration .............. $ 2,865,032
(2) Fire protection .......................... $ 21,267,926
(3) State forests ............................. $ 1,028,879
(4) Forest resources ....................... $ 59,880,561
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the State Forestry Department, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000, to be deposited into the Small Forestland Investment
in Stream Habitat  Program Fund established under ORS 526.404, to provide grants to eligible
small forestland owners pursuant to ORS 526.402.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by Senate June 18, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5521 (SB 5521-A) Page 2